Florida, session 2026, SB436.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (9) of section 31 775.082, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 32 775.082âPenalties; applicability of sentencing structures; 33 mandatory minimum sentences for certain reoffenders previously 34 released from prison.â 35 (9)(a)1.ââPrison releasee reoffenderâ means any defendant 36 who commits, or attempts to commit: 37 a.âTreason; 38 b.âMurder; 39 c.âManslaughter; 40 d.âSexual battery; 41 e.âCarjacking; 42 f.âHome-invasion robbery; 43 g.âRobbery; 44 h.âArson; 45 i.âKidnapping; 46 j.âAggravated assault with a deadly weapon; 47 k.âAggravated battery; 48 l.âAggravated stalking; 49 m.âAircraft piracy; 50 n.âUnlawful throwing, placing, or discharging of a 51 destructive device or bomb; 52 o.âAny felony that involves the use or threat of physical 53 force or violence against an individual; 54 p.âArmed burglary; 55 q.âBurglary of a dwelling or burglary of an occupied 56 structure; or 57 r.âAny felony violation of s. 790.07, s. 800.04, s. 827.03, 58 s. 827.071, or s. 847.0135(5); or 59 s.âBattery on a law enforcement officer which results in 60 bodily injury; 61 62 within 3 years after being released from a state correctional 63 facility operated by the Department of Corrections or a private 64 vendor, a county detention facility following incarceration for 65 an offense for which the sentence pronounced was a prison 66 sentence, or a correctional institution of another state, the 67 District of Columbia, the United States, any possession or 68 territory of the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction, 69 following incarceration for an offense for which the sentence is 70 punishable by more than 1 year in this state. 71 2.ââPrison releasee reoffenderâ also means any defendant 72 who commits or attempts to commit any offense listed in sub 73 subparagraphs 1.a.-s. (a)1.a.-r. while the defendant was serving 74 a prison sentence or on escape status from a state correctional 75 facility operated by the Department of Corrections or a private 76 vendor or while the defendant was on escape status from a 77 correctional institution of another state, the District of 78 Columbia, the United States, any possession or territory of the 79 United States, or any foreign jurisdiction, following 80 incarceration for an offense for which the sentence is 81 punishable by more than 1 year in this state. 82 3.âIf the state attorney determines that a defendant is a 83 prison releasee reoffender as defined in subparagraph 1., the 84 state attorney may seek to have the court sentence the defendant 85 as a prison releasee reoffender. Upon proof from the state 86 attorney that establishes by a preponderance of the evidence 87 that a defendant is a prison releasee reoffender as defined in 88 this section, such defendant is not eligible for sentencing 89 under the sentencing guidelines and must be sentenced as 90 follows: 91 a.âFor a felony punishable by life, by a term of 92 imprisonment for life; 93 b.âFor a felony of the first degree, by a term of 94 imprisonment of 30 years; 95 c.âFor a felony of the second degree, by a term of 96 imprisonment of 15 years; and 97 d.âFor a felony of the third degree, by a term of 98 imprisonment of 5 years. 99 Section 2.âSubsection (2) of section 784.03, Florida 100 Statutes, is amended to read: 101 784.03âBattery; felony battery.â 102 (2)âA person who has one prior conviction for battery, 103 aggravated battery, or felony battery, or resisting an officer 104 with violence under s. 843.01 and who commits any second or 105 subsequent battery commits a felony of the third degree, 106 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 107 For purposes of this subsection, the term âconvictionâ means a 108 determination of guilt that is the result of a plea or a trial, 109 regardless of whether adjudication is withheld or a plea of nolo 110 contendere is entered. 111 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 112 made by this act to section 775.082, Florida Statutes, in 113 references thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (2), paragraph 114 (g) of subsection (4), and subsections (8) and (10) of section 115 775.261, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 116 775.261âThe Florida Career Offender Registration Act.â 117 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 118 (a)ââCareer offenderâ means any person who is designated as 119 a habitual violent felony offender, a violent career criminal, 120 or a three-time violent felony offender under s. 775.084 or as a 121 prison releasee reoffender under s. 775.082(9). 122 (4)âREGISTRATION.â 123 (g)âA career offender who indicates his or her intent to 124 reside in a state or jurisdiction other than the State of 125 Florida and later decides to remain in this state shall, within 126 2 working days after the date upon which the career offender 127 indicated he or she would leave this state, report in person to 128 the sheriff or the department, whichever agency is the agency to 129 which the career offender reported the intended change of 130 residence, of his or her intent to remain in this state. If the 131 sheriff is notified by the career offender that he or she 132 intends to remain in this state, the sheriff shall promptly 133 report this information to the department. A career offender who 134 reports his or her intent to reside in a state or jurisdiction 135 other than the State of Florida, but who remains in this state 136 without reporting to the sheriff or the department in the manner 137 required by this paragraph, commits a felony of the second 138 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 139 775.084. 140 (8)âPENALTIES.â 141 (a)âExcept as otherwise specifically provided, a career 142 offender who fails to register; who fails, after registration, 143 to maintain, acquire, or renew a driver license or 144 identification card; who fails to provide required location 145 information or change-of-name information; or who otherwise 146 fails, by act or omission, to comply with the requirements of 147 this section, commits a felony of the third degree, punishable 148 as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 149 (b)âAny person who misuses public records information 150 concerning a career offender, as defined in this section, or a 151 career offender, as defined in s. 944.608 or s. 944.609, to 152 secure a payment from such career offender; who knowingly 153 distributes or publishes false information concerning such a 154 career offender which the person misrepresents as being public 155 records information; or who materially alters public records 156 information with the intent to misrepresent the information, 157 including documents, summaries of public records information 158 provided by law enforcement agencies, or public records 159 information displayed by law enforcement agencies on websites or 160 provided through other means of communication, commits a 161 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 162 775.082 or s. 775.083. 163 (10)âASSISTING IN NONCOMPLIANCE.âIt is a misdemeanor of the 164 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 165 775.083, for a person who has reason to believe that a career 166 offender is not complying, or has not complied, with the 167 requirements of this section and who, with the intent to assist 168 the career offender in eluding a law enforcement agency that is 169 seeking to find the career offender to question the career 170 offender about, or to arrest the career offender for, his or her 171 noncompliance with the requirements of this section, to: 172 (a)âWithhold information from, or fail to notify, the law 173 enforcement agency about the career offenderâs noncompliance 174 with the requirements of this section and, if known, the 175 whereabouts of the career offender; 176 (b)âHarbor or attempt to harbor, or assist another in 177 harboring or attempting to harbor, the career offender; 178 (c)âConceal or attempt to conceal, or assist another in 179 concealing or attempting to conceal, the career offender; or 180 (d)âProvide information to the law enforcement agency 181 regarding the career offender which the person knows to be 182 false. 183 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 184 made by this act to section 775.082, Florida Statutes, in a 185 reference thereto, paragraph (bb) of subsection (2) of section 186 900.05, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 187 900.05âCriminal justice data collection.â 188 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 189 (bb)ââPrison releasee reoffender flagâ means an indication 190 that the defendant is a prison releasee reoffender as defined in 191 s. 775.082 or any other statute. 192 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 193 made by this act to section 775.082, Florida Statutes, in a 194 reference thereto, subsection (6) of section 903.011, Florida 195 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 196 903.011âPretrial release; general terms; statewide uniform 197 bond schedule.â 198 (6)âA person may not be released before his or her first 199 appearance hearing or bail determination and a judge must 200 determine the appropriate bail, if any, based on an 201 individualized consideration of the criteria in s. 903.046(2), 202 if the person meets any of the following criteria: 203 (a)âThe person was, at the time of arrest for any felony, 204 on pretrial release, probation, or community control in this 205 state or any other state; 206 (b)âThe person was, at the time of arrest, designated as a 207 sexual offender or sexual predator in this state or any other 208 state; 209 (c)âThe person was arrested for violating a protective 210 injunction; 211 (d)âThe person was, at the time of arrest, on release from 212 supervision under s. 947.1405, s. 947.146, s. 947.149, or s. 213 944.4731; 214 (e)âThe person has, at any time before the current arrest, 215 been sentenced pursuant to s. 775.082(9) or s. 775.084 as a 216 prison releasee reoffender, habitual violent felony offender, 217 three-time violent felony offender, or violent career criminal; 218 (f)âThe person has been arrested three or more times in the 219 6 months immediately preceding his or her arrest for the current 220 offense; or 221 (g)âThe personâs current offense of arrest is for one or 222 more of the following crimes: 223 1.âA capital felony, life felony, felony of the first 224 degree, or felony of the second degree; 225 2.âA homicide under chapter 782; or any attempt, 226 solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a homicide; 227 3.âAssault in furtherance of a riot or an aggravated riot; 228 felony battery; domestic battery by strangulation; domestic 229 violence, as defined in s. 741.28; stalking; mob intimidation; 230 assault or battery on a law enforcement officer; assault or 231 battery on juvenile probation officer, or other staff of a 232 detention center or commitment facility, or a staff member of a 233 commitment facility, or health services personnel; assault or 234 battery on a person 65 years of age or older; robbery; burglary; 235 carjacking; or resisting an officer with violence; 236 4.âKidnapping, false imprisonment, human trafficking, or 237 human smuggling; 238 5.âPossession of a firearm or ammunition by a felon, 239 violent career criminal, or person subject to an injunction 240 against committing acts of domestic violence, stalking, or 241 cyberstalking; 242 6.âSexual battery; indecent, lewd, or lascivious touching; 243 exposure of sexual organs; incest; luring or enticing a child; 244 or child pornography; 245 7.âAbuse, neglect, or exploitation of an elderly person or 246 disabled adult; 247 8.âChild abuse or aggravated child abuse; 248 9.âArson; riot, aggravated riot, inciting a riot, or 249 aggravated inciting a riot; or a burglary or theft during a 250 riot; 251 10.âEscape; tampering or retaliating against a witness, 252 victim, or informant; destruction of evidence; or tampering with 253 a jury; 254 11.âAny offense committed for the purpose of benefiting, 255 promoting, or furthering the interests of a criminal gang; 256 12.âTrafficking in a controlled substance, including 257 conspiracy to engage in trafficking in a controlled substance; 258 13.âRacketeering; or 259 14.âFailure to appear at required court proceedings while 260 on bail. 261 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 262 made by this act to section 775.082, Florida Statutes, in a 263 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of section 264 907.041, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 265 907.041âPretrial detention and release.â 266 (5)âPRETRIAL DETENTION.â 267 (c)âUpon motion by the state attorney, the court may order 268 pretrial detention if it finds a substantial probability, based 269 on a defendantâs past and present patterns of behavior, the 270 criteria in s. 903.046, and any other relevant facts, that any 271 of the following circumstances exist: 272 1.âThe defendant has previously violated conditions of 273 release and that no further conditions of release are reasonably 274 likely to assure the defendantâs appearance at subsequent 275 proceedings; 276 2.âThe defendant, with the intent to obstruct the judicial 277 process, has threatened, intimidated, or injured any victim, 278 potential witness, juror, or judicial officer, or has attempted 279 or conspired to do so, and that no condition of release will 280 reasonably prevent the obstruction of the judicial process; 281 3.âThe defendant is charged with trafficking in controlled 282 substances as defined by s. 893.135, that there is a substantial 283 probability that the defendant has committed the offense, and 284 that no conditions of release will reasonably assure the 285 defendantâs appearance at subsequent criminal proceedings; 286 4.âThe defendant is charged with DUI manslaughter, as 287 defined by s. 316.193, and that there is a substantial 288 probability that the defendant committed the crime and that the 289 defendant poses a threat of harm to the community; conditions 290 that would support a finding by the court pursuant to this 291 subparagraph that the defendant poses a threat of harm to the 292 community include, but are not limited to, any of the following: 293 a.âThe defendant has previously been convicted of any crime 294 under s. 316.193, or of any crime in any other state or 295 territory of the United States that is substantially similar to 296 any crime under s. 316.193; 297 b.âThe defendant was driving with a suspended driver 298 license when the charged crime was committed; or 299 c.âThe defendant has previously been found guilty of, or 300 has had adjudication of guilt withheld for, driving while the 301 defendantâs driver license was suspended or revoked in violation 302 of s. 322.34; 303 5.âThe defendant poses the threat of harm to the community. 304 The court may so conclude, if it finds that the defendant is 305 presently charged with a dangerous crime, that there is a 306 substantial probability that the defendant committed such crime, 307 that the factual circumstances of the crime indicate a disregard 308 for the safety of the community, and that there are no 309 conditions of release reasonably sufficient to protect the 310 community from the risk of physical harm to persons; 311 6.âThe defendant was on probation, parole, or other release 312 pending completion of sentence or on pretrial release for a 313 dangerous crime at the time the current offense was committed; 314 7.âThe defendant has violated one or more conditions of 315 pretrial release or bond for the offense currently before the 316 court and the violation, in the discretion of the court, 317 supports a finding that no conditions of release can reasonably 318 protect the community from risk of physical harm to persons or 319 assure the presence of the accused at trial; or 320 8.a.âThe defendant has ever been sentenced pursuant to s. 321 775.082(9) or s. 775.084 as a prison releasee reoffender, 322 habitual violent felony offender, three-time violent felony 323 offender, or violent career criminal, or the state attorney 324 files a notice seeking that the defendant be sentenced pursuant 325 to s. 775.082(9) or s. 775.084, as a prison releasee reoffender, 326 habitual violent felony offender, three-time violent felony 327 offender, or violent career criminal; 328 b.âThere is a substantial probability that the defendant 329 committed the offense; and 330 c.âThere are no conditions of release that can reasonably 331 protect the community from risk of physical harm or ensure the 332 presence of the accused at trial. 333 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 334 made by this act to section 775.082, Florida Statutes, in 335 references thereto, subsections (1) and (8) of section 944.608, 336 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 337 944.608âNotification to Department of Law Enforcement of 338 information on career offenders.â 339 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âcareer offenderâ 340 means a person who is in the custody or control of, or under the 341 supervision of, the department or is in the custody or control 342 of, or under the supervision of, a contractor-operated 343 correctional facility, and who is designated as a habitual 344 violent felony offender, a violent career criminal, or a three 345 time violent felony offender under s. 775.084 or as a prison 346 releasee reoffender under s. 775.082(9). 347 (8)âThe failure of a career offender to submit to the 348 taking of a digitized photograph, or to otherwise comply with 349 the requirements of this section, is a felony of the third 350 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 351 775.084. 352 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 353 made by this act to section 775.082, Florida Statutes, in a 354 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 944.609, Florida 355 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 356 944.609âCareer offenders; notification upon release.â 357 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âcareer offenderâ 358 means a person who is in the custody or control of, or under the 359 supervision of, the department or is in the custody or control 360 of, or under the supervision of a contractor-operated 361 correctional facility, who is designated as a habitual violent 362 felony offender, a violent career criminal, or a three-time 363 violent felony offender under s. 775.084 or as a prison releasee 364 reoffender under s. 775.082(9). 365 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 366 made by this act to section 775.082, Florida Statutes, in a 367 reference thereto, paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (7) of 368 section 944.705, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 369 944.705âRelease orientation program.â 370 (7)(a)âThe department shall notify every inmate in the 371 inmateâs release documents: 372 1.âOf all outstanding terms of the inmateâs sentence at the 373 time of release to assist the inmate in determining his or her 374 status with regard to the completion of all terms of sentence, 375 as that term is defined in s. 98.0751. This subparagraph does 376 not apply to inmates who are being released from the custody of 377 the department to any type of supervision monitored by the 378 department; and 379 2.âIn not less than 18-point type, that the inmate may be 380 sentenced pursuant to s. 775.082(9) if the inmate commits any 381 felony offense described in s. 775.082(9) within 3 years after 382 the inmateâs release. This notice must be prefaced by the word 383 âWARNINGâ in boldfaced type. 384 (b)âThis section does not preclude the sentencing of a 385 person pursuant to s. 775.082(9), and evidence that the 386 department failed to provide this notice does not prohibit a 387 person from being sentenced pursuant to s. 775.082(9). The state 388 is not required to demonstrate that a person received any notice 389 from the department in order for the court to impose a sentence 390 pursuant to s. 775.082(9). 391 Section 10.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 392 made by this act to section 784.03, Florida Statutes, in a 393 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 943.0584, Florida 394 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 395 943.0584âCriminal history records ineligible for court 396 ordered expunction or court-ordered sealing.â 397 (2)âA criminal history record is ineligible for a 398 certificate of eligibility for expunction or a court-ordered 399 expunction pursuant to s. 943.0585 or a certificate of 400 eligibility for sealing or a court-ordered sealing pursuant to 401 s. 943.059 if the record is a conviction for any of the 402 following offenses: 403 (a)âSexual misconduct, as defined in s. 393.135, s. 404 394.4593, or s. 916.1075; 405 (b)âIllegal use of explosives, as defined in chapter 552; 406 (c)âTerrorism, as defined in s. 775.30; 407 (d)âMurder, as defined in s. 782.04, s. 782.065, or s. 408 782.09; 409 (e)âManslaughter or homicide, as defined in s. 782.07, s. 410 782.071, or s. 782.072; 411 (f)âAssault or battery, as defined in ss. 784.011 and 412 784.03, respectively, of one family or household member by 413 another family or household member, as defined in s. 741.28(3); 414 (g)âAggravated assault, as defined in s. 784.021; 415 (h)âFelony battery, domestic battery by strangulation, or 416 aggravated battery, as defined in ss. 784.03, 784.041, and 417 784.045, respectively; 418 (i)âStalking or aggravated stalking, as defined in s. 419 784.048; 420 (j)âLuring or enticing a child, as defined in s. 787.025; 421 (k)âHuman trafficking, as defined in s. 787.06; 422 (l)âKidnapping or false imprisonment, as defined in s. 423 787.01 or s. 787.02; 424 (m)âAny offense defined in chapter 794; 425 (n)âProcuring a person less than 18 years of age for 426 prostitution, as defined in former s. 796.03; 427 (o)âLewd or lascivious offenses committed upon or in the 428 presence of persons less than 16 years of age, as defined in s. 429 800.04; 430 (p)âArson, as defined in s. 806.01; 431 (q)âBurglary of a dwelling, as defined in s. 810.02; 432 (r)âVoyeurism or digital voyeurism, as defined in ss. 433 810.14 and 810.145, respectively; 434 (s)âRobbery or robbery by sudden snatching, as defined in 435 ss. 812.13 and 812.131, respectively; 436 (t)âCarjacking, as defined in s. 812.133; 437 (u)âHome-invasion robbery, as defined in s. 812.135; 438 (v)âA violation of the Florida Communications Fraud Act, as 439 provided in s. 817.034; 440 (w)âAbuse of an elderly person or disabled adult, or 441 aggravated abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult, as 442 defined in s. 825.102; 443 (x)âLewd or lascivious offenses committed upon or in the 444 presence of an elderly person or disabled person, as defined in 445 s. 825.1025; 446 (y)âChild abuse or aggravated child abuse, as defined in s. 447 827.03; 448 (z)âSexual performance by a child, as defined in s. 449 827.071; 450 (aa)âAny offense defined in chapter 839; 451 (bb)âCertain acts in connection with obscenity, as defined 452 in s. 847.0133; 453 (cc)âAny offense defined in s. 847.0135; 454 (dd)âSelling or buying of minors, as defined in s. 455 847.0145; 456 (ee)âAircraft piracy, as defined in s. 860.16; 457 (ff)âManufacturing a controlled substance in violation of 458 chapter 893; 459 (gg)âDrug trafficking, as defined in s. 893.135; or 460 (hh)âAny violation specified as a predicate offense for 461 registration as a sexual predator pursuant to s. 775.21, or 462 sexual offender pursuant to s. 943.0435, without regard to 463 whether that offense alone is sufficient to require such 464 registration. 465 Section 11.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.